New York, session 2025-2026, S10511.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Bryant Ortiz act". 3 § 2. The section heading of section 511 of the vehicle and traffic 4 law, as added by chapter 756 of the laws of 1985, is amended and a new 5 subdivision 3-a is added to read as follows: 6 Operation while license or privilege is suspended or revoked; aggra- 7 vated unlicensed operation; aggravated unlicensed operation of a motor 8 vehicle resulting in death. 9 3-a. Aggravated unlicensed operation of a motor vehicle resulting in 10 death. (a) A person is guilty of the offense of aggravated unlicensed 11 operation of a motor vehicle resulting in death when such person oper- 12 ates a motor vehicle upon a public highway without a valid license or in 13 violation of the conditions of a learner's permit or any other limited 14 driving privilege, including conditional and restricted use licenses, 15 and in the course of such unlawful operation commits a traffic infrac- 16 tion or engages in negligent operation of a motor vehicle, and such 17 operation results in the death of another person. 18 (b) Aggravated unlicensed operation of a motor vehicle resulting in 19 death is a class E felony. When a person is convicted of this crime, the 20 sentence of the court must be: (i) a fine in an amount not less than 21 five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars; and (ii) a 22 term of imprisonment as provided in the penal law for a class E felony. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 24 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15754-02-6